04_Morphology/morph/grn.lexc
Multichar_Symbols

%>                   ! Morpheme boundary
%<n%>                ! Noun
%<pl%>               ! Plural
%<sg%>   	     ! Singular
%<gen%>              ! possesive
%<akk%>              ! akkusative
%<dat%>              ! dative
%<nom%>              ! nominative
%{m%}                ! multichar

LEXICON Root
Nouns ;

LEXICON NEVER-MARKED-CASE
%<sg%>%<nom%>: %> #;
%<sg%>%<akk%> : %> #;

LEXICON UNMARKED-CASE
%<gen%>: %> #;
%<dat%>: %> #;

LEXICON MARKED-CASE
%<gen%>:%>%{m%}s #;   !"genitive"               
%<dat%>:%>%{m%}n #;   !"dative"

LEXICON DIM
%<dim%>:%>chen #;   !"diminuative"            "Umlaut!"

LEXICON HOOD
%<-ship%>:%>schaff #;   !"ship or hood"

LEXICON PL1
%<n%>%<pl%>:%>e # ;   !"plural"
%<n%>%<sg%>:%> # ;   !"singular"

LEXICON PL2
%<n%>%<pl%>:%> #;   !"plural"
%<n%>%<sg%>:%> #;   !"singular" 

LEXICON PL3
%<n%>%<pl%>:%>s #;   !"plural"
%<n%>%<sg%>:%> #;   !"singular"

LEXICON PL4
%<n%>%<pl%>:%>er #;   !"plural"                "Umlaut!"
%<n%>%<sg%>:%> #;   !"singular"

LEXICON PL5
%<n%>%<pl%>:%>e #;   !"plural"                 "Umlaut!"
%<n%>%<sg%>:%> #;   !"singular"

LEXICON PL6
%<n%>%<pl%>:%>%{m%}n #;   !"plural"                 "e or en"
%<n%>%<sg%>:%> #;   !"singular"



LEXICON Nouns

Hund:Hund PL1 ;   !"dog"
Hund:Hund MARKED-CASE ;
Hund:Hund NEVER-MARKED-CASE ;
Hund:Hund DIM ;

Freund:Freund PL1 ;   !"friend"
Freund:Freund MARKED-CASE ;
Freund:Freund NEVER-MARKED-CASE;
Fruend:Freund HOOD ;

Löffel:Löffel PL2 ;   !"spoon"
Löffel:Löffel MARKED-CASE ;
Löffel:Löffel NEVER-MARKED-CASE;  

Kino:Kino PL3 ;   !"movie theater"
Kino:Kino MARKED-CASE ;
Kino:Kino NEVER-MARKED-CASE; 

Kind:Kind PL4 ;   !"child"
Kind:Kind MARKED-CASE ;
Kind:Kind NEVER-MARKED-CASE;

Wand:Wand PL5 ;   !"wall"
Wand:Wand UNMARKED-CASE ;
Wand:Wand NEVER-MARKED-CASE;

Wohnung:Wohnung PL6 ;   !"apartment"
Wohnung:Wohnung UNMARKED-CASE ;
Wohnung:Wohnung NEVER-MARKED-CASE;

Katze:Katze PL6 ;  !"cat"
Katze:Katze UNMARKED-CASE ;
Katze:Katze NEVER-MARKED-CASE ;
Katze:Katze DIM ;
